Utah statutes.
10-2-302.   Change of class of municipality.

(1)  Each municipality shall retain its classification under Section 10-2-301 until changed as provided in this section or Subsection 67-1a-2(3).

(2)  If a municipality's population, as determined by the lieutenant governor under Subsection 67-1a-2(3), indicates that the municipality's population has decreased below the limit for its current class, the legislative body of the municipality may petition the lieutenant governor to prepare a certificate indicating the class in which the municipality belongs based on the decreased population figure.

(3)  A municipality's change in class is effective on the date of the lieutenant governor's certificate under Subsection 67-1a-2(3).



Amended by Chapter 350, 2009 General Session

